Illinois, session 104th, SB2348.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the Hair Braiding 5Opportunity Act. 6    Section 5. The Regulatory Sunset Act is amended by 7changing Section 4.36 as follows: 8    (5 ILCS 80/4.36)9    Sec. 4.36. Acts repealed on January 1, 2026. The following 10Acts are repealed on January 1, 2026: 11    The Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair Braiding, and 12Nail Technology Act of 1985.13    The Collection Agency Act.14    The Hearing Instrument Consumer Protection Act.15    The Illinois Athletic Trainers Practice Act.16    The Illinois Dental Practice Act. 17    The Illinois Roofing Industry Licensing Act.18    The Illinois Physical Therapy Act.19    The Professional Geologist Licensing Act.20    The Respiratory Care Practice Act.21(Source: P.A. 99-26, eff. 7-10-15; 99-204, eff. 7-30-15; 2299-227, eff. 8-3-15; 99-229, eff. 8-3-15; 99-230, eff. 8-3-15;   SB2348- 2 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b199-427, eff. 8-21-15; 99-469, eff. 8-26-15; 99-492, eff. 212-31-15; 99-642, eff. 7-28-16.) 3    Section 10. The Massage Therapy Practice Act is amended by 4changing Section 30 as follows: 5    (225 ILCS 57/30)6    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)7    Sec. 30. Title protection. 8    (a) Persons regulated by this Act are designated as 9massage therapists and therefore are exclusively entitled to 10utilize the terms "massage", "massage therapy", and "massage 11therapist" when advertising or printing promotional material.12    (b) Anyone who knowingly aids and abets one or more 13persons not authorized to use a professional title regulated 14by this Act or knowingly employs persons not authorized to use 15the regulated professional title in the course of their 16employment, commits a violation of this Act.17    (c) Anyone not authorized, under the definitions of this 18Act, to utilize the term "massage", "massage therapy", or 19"massage therapist" and who knowingly utilizes these terms 20when advertising commits a violation of this Act.21    (d) Nothing in this Act shall prohibit the use of the terms 22"massage", "massage therapy", or "massage therapist" by a 23salon registered under the Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, 24Hair Braiding, and Nail Technology Act of 1985, provided that   SB2348- 3 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1the salon offers massage therapy services in accordance with 2this Act. 3(Source: P.A. 97-514, eff. 8-23-11.) 4    Section 15. The Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair 5Braiding, and Nail Technology Act of 1985 is amended by 6changing the heading of Articles IIIB and IIID and Sections 71-1, 1-2, 1-4, 1-7, 1-7.5, 1-7.10, 1-10, 1-11, 3B-1, 3B-10, 83B-11, 3B-12, 3B-15, 3B-16, 3C-8, 3D-5, 4-1, 4-2, 4-4, 4-6.1, 94-7, 4-9, 4-19, and 4-20 as follows: 10    (225 ILCS 410/1-1)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1701-1)11    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)12    Sec. 1-1. Title of Act. This Act may be cited as the 13Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair Braiding, and Nail 14Technology Act of 1985.15(Source: P.A. 96-1246, eff. 1-1-11.) 16    (225 ILCS 410/1-2)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1701-2)17    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)18    Sec. 1-2. Public policy. The practices of barbering, 19cosmetology, esthetics, hair braiding, and nail technology in 20the State of Illinois are hereby declared to affect the public 21health, safety and welfare and to be subject to regulation and 22control in the public interest. It is further declared to be a 23matter of public interest and concern that the professions   SB2348- 4 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1merit and receive the confidence of the public and that only 2qualified persons be permitted to practice said professions in 3the State of Illinois. This Act shall be liberally construed 4to carry out these objects and purposes.5(Source: P.A. 98-911, eff. 1-1-15.) 6    (225 ILCS 410/1-4)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)8    Sec. 1-4. Definitions. In this Act the following words 9shall have the following meanings:10    "Address of record" means the designated address recorded 11by the Department in the applicant's application file or the 12licensee's license file, as maintained by the Department's 13licensure maintenance unit. 14    "Board" means the Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair 15Braiding, and Nail Technology Board. 16    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 17Professional Regulation.18    "Licensed barber" means an individual licensed by the 19Department to practice barbering as defined in this Act and 20whose license is in good standing.21    "Licensed cosmetologist" means an individual licensed by 22the Department to practice cosmetology, nail technology, hair 23braiding, and esthetics as defined in this Act and whose 24license is in good standing.25    "Licensed esthetician" means an individual licensed by the   SB2348- 5 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1Department to practice esthetics as defined in this Act and 2whose license is in good standing.3    "Licensed nail technician" means an individual licensed by 4the Department to practice nail technology as defined in this 5Act and whose license is in good standing.6    "Licensed barber teacher" means an individual licensed by 7the Department to practice barbering as defined in this Act 8and to provide instruction in the theory and practice of 9barbering to students in an approved barber school.10    "Licensed cosmetology teacher" means an individual 11licensed by the Department to practice cosmetology, esthetics, 12hair braiding, and nail technology as defined in this Act and 13to provide instruction in the theory and practice of 14cosmetology, esthetics, hair braiding, and nail technology to 15students in an approved cosmetology, esthetics, hair braiding, 16or nail technology school.17    "Licensed cosmetology clinic teacher" means an individual 18licensed by the Department to practice cosmetology, esthetics, 19hair braiding, and nail technology as defined in this Act and 20to provide clinical instruction in the practice of 21cosmetology, esthetics, hair braiding, and nail technology in 22an approved school of cosmetology, esthetics, hair braiding, 23or nail technology.24    "Licensed esthetics teacher" means an individual licensed 25by the Department to practice esthetics as defined in this Act 26and to provide instruction in the theory and practice of   SB2348- 6 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1esthetics to students in an approved cosmetology or esthetics 2school.3    "Licensed hair braider" means an individual licensed by 4the Department to practice hair braiding as defined in this 5Act and whose license is in good standing.6    "Licensed hair braiding teacher" means an individual 7licensed by the Department to practice hair braiding and to 8provide instruction in the theory and practice of hair 9braiding to students in an approved cosmetology or hair 10braiding school. 11    "Licensed nail technology teacher" means an individual 12licensed by the Department to practice nail technology and to 13provide instruction in the theory and practice of nail 14technology to students in an approved nail technology or 15cosmetology school.16    "Enrollment" is the date upon which the student signs an 17enrollment agreement or student contract.18    "Enrollment agreement" or "student contract" is any 19agreement, instrument, or contract however named, which 20creates or evidences an obligation binding a student to 21purchase a course of instruction from a school.22    "Enrollment time" means the maximum number of hours a 23student could have attended class, whether or not the student 24did in fact attend all those hours.25    "Elapsed enrollment time" means the enrollment time 26elapsed between the actual starting date and the date of the   SB2348- 7 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1student's last day of physical attendance in the school.2    "Mobile shop or salon" means a self-contained facility 3that may be moved, towed, or transported from one location to 4another and in which barbering, cosmetology, esthetics, hair 5braiding, or nail technology is practiced. 6    "Secretary" means the Secretary of the Department of 7Financial and Professional Regulation. 8    "Threading" means any technique that results in the 9removal of superfluous hair from the body by twisting thread 10around unwanted hair and then pulling it from the skin; and may 11also include the incidental trimming of eyebrow hair. 12(Source: P.A. 98-238, eff. 1-1-14; 98-911, eff. 1-1-15; 1399-427, eff. 8-21-15.) 14    (225 ILCS 410/1-7)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1701-7)15    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)16    Sec. 1-7. Licensure required; renewal; restoration. 17    (a) It is unlawful for any person to practice, or to hold 18himself or herself out to be a cosmetologist, esthetician, 19nail technician, hair braider, or barber without a license as 20a cosmetologist, esthetician, nail technician, hair braider or 21barber issued by the Department pursuant to the provisions of 22this Act and of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. It 23is also unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, limited 24liability company, or corporation to own, operate, or conduct 25a cosmetology, esthetics, nail technology, hair braiding, or   SB2348- 8 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1barber school without a license issued by the Department or to 2own or operate a cosmetology, esthetics, or nail technology 3salon; , or hair braiding salon, barber shop; , or other 4business subject to the registration requirements of this Act 5without a certificate of registration issued by the 6Department. It is further unlawful for any person to teach in 7any cosmetology, esthetics, nail technology, hair braiding, or 8barber college or school approved by the Department or hold 9himself or herself out as a cosmetology, esthetics, hair 10braiding, nail technology, or barber teacher without a license 11as a teacher, issued by the Department or as a cosmetology 12clinic teacher without a license as a cosmetology clinic 13teacher issued by the Department.14    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, a 15person licensed as a cosmetologist may hold himself or herself 16out as an esthetician and may engage in the practice of 17esthetics, as defined in this Act, without being licensed as 18an esthetician. A person licensed as a cosmetology teacher may 19teach esthetics or hold himself or herself out as an esthetics 20teacher without being licensed as an esthetics teacher. A 21person licensed as a cosmetologist may hold himself or herself 22out as a nail technician and may engage in the practice of nail 23technology, as defined in this Act, without being licensed as 24a nail technician. A person licensed as a cosmetology teacher 25may teach nail technology and hold himself or herself out as a 26nail technology teacher without being licensed as a nail   SB2348- 9 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1technology teacher. A person licensed as a cosmetologist may 2hold himself or herself out as a hair braider and may engage in 3the practice of hair braiding, as defined in this Act, without 4being licensed as a hair braider. A person licensed as a 5cosmetology teacher may teach hair braiding and hold himself 6or herself out as a hair braiding teacher without being 7licensed as a hair braiding teacher.8    (c) A person licensed as a barber teacher may hold himself 9or herself out as a barber and may practice barbering without a 10license as a barber. A person licensed as a cosmetology 11teacher may hold himself or herself out as a cosmetologist, 12esthetician, hair braider, and nail technologist and may 13practice cosmetology, esthetics, hair braiding, and nail 14technology without a license as a cosmetologist, esthetician, 15hair braider, or nail technologist. A person licensed as an 16esthetics teacher may hold himself or herself out as an 17esthetician without being licensed as an esthetician and may 18practice esthetics. A person licensed as a nail technician 19teacher may practice nail technology and may hold himself or 20herself out as a nail technologist without being licensed as a 21nail technologist. A person licensed as a hair braiding 22teacher may practice hair braiding and may hold himself or 23herself out as a hair braider without being licensed as a hair 24braider. 25    (d) The holder of a license issued under this Act may renew 26that license during the month preceding the expiration date of   SB2348- 10 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1the license by paying the required fee. 2    (e) The expiration date, renewal period, and conditions 3for renewal and restoration of each license shall be 4established by rule.5    (f) A license issued under the provisions of this Act as a 6barber, barber teacher, cosmetologist, cosmetology teacher, 7cosmetology clinic teacher, esthetician, esthetics teacher, 8nail technician, or nail technician teacher , hair braider, or 9hair braiding teacher that has expired while the holder of the 10license was engaged (1) in federal service on active duty with 11the Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Air Force, Space Force, or Coast 12Guard of the United States of America, or any Women's 13Auxiliary thereof, or the State Militia called into the 14service or training of the United States of America or (2) in 15training or education under the supervision of the United 16States preliminary to induction into the military service, may 17be reinstated or restored without payment of any lapsed 18renewal fees, reinstatement fee, or restoration fee if within 192 years after the termination of such service, training, or 20education other than by dishonorable discharge, the holder 21furnishes the Department with an affidavit to the effect that 22he or she has been so engaged and that his or her service, 23training, or education has been so terminated. 24    (g) No application shall be automatically placed on hold, 25delayed, denied, or otherwise not processed by the Department 26because it was submitted by a person who is incarcerated. The   SB2348- 11 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1Department shall process applications for original licensure 2or restoration of a license of a person who is incarcerated 3without any additional requirements or delays, and the 4Department shall issue original licenses or restore the 5licenses of persons who are incarcerated who have submitted 6their application and who otherwise qualify for licensure. The 7Department shall consider practice supervised by a licensee 8while a person is incarcerated in determining qualifications 9for a license. The Director may also waive the 3-year time 10limitations under subsection (d) or (e) of Section 4-5 for a 11person who was incarcerated at the time of application.12    In this subsection, "incarcerated" means committed to the 13Department of Corrections, a Federal Bureau of Prisons 14facility located in Illinois, or a county jail or county 15department of corrections 16(Source: P.A. 103-746, eff. 1-1-25.) 17    (225 ILCS 410/1-7.5)18    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)19    Sec. 1-7.5. Unlicensed practice; violation; civil penalty. 20    (a) Any person who practices, offers to practice, attempts 21to practice, or holds himself or herself out to practice 22barbering, cosmetology, esthetics, hair braiding, or nail 23technology without being licensed under this Act shall, in 24addition to any other penalty provided by law, pay a civil 25penalty to the Department in an amount not to exceed $5,000 for   SB2348- 12 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1each offense as determined by the Department. The civil 2penalty shall be assessed by the Department after a hearing is 3held in accordance with the provisions set forth in this Act 4regarding disciplining a licensee.5    (b) The Department has the authority and power to 6investigate any and all unlicensed activity. 7    (c) The civil penalty shall be paid within 60 days after 8the effective date of the order imposing the civil penalty. 9The order shall constitute a judgment and may be filed and 10execution had thereon in the same manner as any judgment from 11any court of record.12(Source: P.A. 96-1246, eff. 1-1-11.) 13    (225 ILCS 410/1-7.10)14    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)15    Sec. 1-7.10. Abnormal skin growth education.16    (a) In addition to any other requirements under this Act, 17the following applicants must provide proof of completion of a 18course approved by the Department in abnormal skin growth 19education, including training on identifying melanoma:20        (1) An applicant who submits an application for 21    original licensure on or after January 1, 2026.22        (2) An applicant who was licensed before January 1, 23    2026 when submitting the applicant's first application for 24    renewal or restoration of a license on or after January 1, 25    2026.   SB2348- 13 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1    (b) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to create a 2cause of action or any civil liabilities or to require or 3permit a licensee or applicant under this Act to practice 4medicine or otherwise practice outside of the scope of 5practice of a licensed barber, cosmetologist, esthetician, 6hair braider, or nail technician. 7    (c) A person licensed under this Act may refer an 8individual to seek care from a medical professional regarding 9an abnormal skin growth. Neither a person licensed under this 10Act who completes abnormal skin growth education as a part of 11the person's continuing education, nor the person's employer, 12shall be civilly or criminally liable for acting in good faith 13or failing to act on information obtained during the course of 14practicing in the person's profession or employment concerning 15potential abnormal skin growths. 16(Source: P.A. 103-851, eff. 8-9-24.) 17    (225 ILCS 410/1-10)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1701-10)18    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)19    Sec. 1-10. Display. Every holder of a license shall 20display it in a place in the holder's principal office, place 21of business or place of employment. Whenever a licensed 22cosmetologist, esthetician, nail technician, hair braider, or 23barber practices cosmetology, esthetics, nail technology, hair 24braiding, or barbering outside of or away from the 25cosmetologist's, esthetician's, nail technician's, hair   SB2348- 14 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1braider's, or barber's principal office, place of business, or 2place of employment, the cosmetologist, esthetician, nail 3technician, hair braider, or barber shall provide any person 4so requesting proof that he or she has a valid license issued 5by the Department.6    Every registered shop shall display its certificate of 7registration at the location of the shop. Each shop where 8barber, cosmetology, esthetics, hair braiding, or nail 9technology services are provided shall have a certificate of 10registration.11(Source: P.A. 99-427, eff. 8-21-15.) 12    (225 ILCS 410/1-11)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1701-11)13    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)14    Sec. 1-11. Exceptions to Act. 15    (a) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to apply to the 16educational activities conducted in connection with any 17monthly, annual or other special educational program of any 18bona fide association of licensed cosmetologists, 19estheticians, nail technicians, hair braiders, or barbers, or 20licensed cosmetology, esthetics, nail technology, hair 21braiding, or barber schools from which the general public is 22excluded.23    (b) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to apply to the 24activities and services of registered nurses or licensed 25practical nurses, as defined in the Nurse Practice Act, or to   SB2348- 15 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1personal care or health care services provided by individuals 2in the performance of their duties as employed or authorized 3by facilities or programs licensed or certified by State 4agencies. As used in this subsection (b), "personal care" 5means assistance with meals, dressing, movement, bathing, or 6other personal needs or maintenance or general supervision and 7oversight of the physical and mental well-being of an 8individual who is incapable of maintaining a private, 9independent residence or who is incapable of managing his or 10her person whether or not a guardian has been appointed for 11that individual. The definition of "personal care" as used in 12this subsection (b) shall not otherwise be construed to negate 13the requirements of this Act or its rules.14    (c) Nothing in this Act shall be deemed to require 15licensure of individuals employed by the motion picture, film, 16television, stage play or related industry for the purpose of 17providing cosmetology or esthetics services to actors of that 18industry while engaged in the practice of cosmetology or 19esthetics as a part of that person's employment.20    (d) Nothing in this Act shall be deemed to require 21licensure of an inmate of the Department of Corrections who 22performs barbering or cosmetology with the approval of the 23Department of Corrections during the person's incarceration. 24    (e) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to apply to or 25require licensure of a hair braider or hair braider instructor 26who is practicing hair braiding or teaching hair braiding.   SB2348- 16 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1"Hair braiding" is a natural form of hair manipulation by 2braiding, cornrowing, extending, lacing, locking, sewing, 3twisting, weaving, or wrapping human hair, natural fibers, 4synthetic fibers, and hair extensions. Such practice can be 5performed by hand or by using simple braiding devices 6including clips, combs, hairpins, scissors, needles, and 7thread. Hair braiding includes what is commonly known as 8"African-style hair braiding" or "natural hair care", but is 9not limited to any particular cultural, ethnic, racial, or 10religious form of hair style. Hair braiding includes the 11making of customized wigs from natural hair, natural fibers, 12synthetic fibers, and hair extensions. Hair braiding does not 13involve the use of penetrating chemical hair treatments, 14chemical hair coloring agents, chemical hair straightening 15agents, chemical hair joining agents, permanent wave styles, 16or chemical hair bleaching agents applied to growing human 17hair. Hair braiding does not include the cutting or growing of 18human hair, but may include the trimming of hair extensions or 19sewn weave-in extensions only as applicable to the braiding 20process. 21(Source: P.A. 99-427, eff. 8-21-15.) 22    (225 ILCS 410/Art. IIIB heading)23ARTICLE IIIB. BARBER, COSMETOLOGY, ESTHETICS, HAIR BRAIDING, 24AND NAIL TECHNOLOGY SCHOOLS25(Source: P.A. 98-911, eff. 1-1-15.)   SB2348- 17 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1    (225 ILCS 410/3B-1)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1703B-1)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 3B-1. Application. The provisions of this Article are 4applicable only to barber, cosmetology, esthetics, hair 5braiding, and nail technology schools regulated under this 6Act.7(Source: P.A. 98-911, eff. 1-1-15.) 8    (225 ILCS 410/3B-10)9    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)10    Sec. 3B-10. Requisites for ownership or operation of 11school. No person, firm, or corporation may own, operate, or 12conduct a school of barbering, cosmetology, esthetics, hair 13braiding, or nail technology for the purpose of teaching 14barbering, cosmetology, esthetics, hair braiding, or nail 15technology for compensation unless licensed by the Department. 16A licensed school is a postsecondary educational institution 17authorized by the Department to provide a postsecondary 18education program in compliance with the requirements of this 19Act. An applicant shall apply to the Department on forms 20provided by the Department, pay the required fees, and comply 21with the following requirements:22        1. The applicant must submit to the Department for 23    approval:24            a. A floor plan, drawn to a scale specified on the   SB2348- 18 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1        floor plan, showing every detail of the proposed 2        school; and 3            b. A lease commitment or proof of ownership for 4        the location of the proposed school; a lease 5        commitment must provide for execution of the lease 6        upon the Department's approval of the school's 7        application and the lease must be for a period of at 8        least one year.9            c. (Blank).10        2. An application to own or operate a school shall 11    include the following:12            a. If the owner is a corporation, a copy of the 13        Articles of Incorporation or, if the owner is a 14        limited liability company, a copy of the articles of 15        organization;16            b. If the owner is a partnership, a listing of all 17        partners and their current addresses;18            c. If the applicant is an owner, a completed 19        financial statement showing the owner's ability to 20        operate the school for at least 3 months;21            d. A copy of the official enrollment agreement or 22        student contract to be used by the school, which shall 23        be consistent with the requirements of this Act and 24        rules;25            e. A listing of all teachers who will be in the 26        school's employ, including their teacher license   SB2348- 19 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1        numbers;2            f. A copy of the curricula that will be followed;3            g. The names, addresses, and current status of all 4        schools in which the applicant has previously owned 5        any interest, and a declaration as to whether any of 6        these schools were ever denied accreditation or 7        licensing or lost accreditation or licensing from any 8        governmental body or accrediting agency;9            h. Each application for a certificate of approval 10        shall be signed and certified under oath by the 11        school's chief managing employee and also by its 12        individual owner or owners; if the applicant is a 13        partnership or a corporation, then the application 14        shall be signed and certified under oath by the 15        school's chief managing employee and also by each 16        member of the partnership or each officer of the 17        corporation, as the case may be;18            i. A copy of the school's official transcript; and19            j. The required fee.20        3. Each application for a license to operate a school 21    shall also contain the following commitments:22            a. To conduct the school in accordance with this 23        Act and the standards, and rules from time to time 24        adopted under this Act and to meet standards and 25        requirements at least as stringent as those required 26        by Part H of the Federal Higher Education Act of 1965.  SB2348- 20 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1            b. To permit the Department to inspect the school 2        or classes thereof from time to time with or without 3        notice; and to make available to the Department, at 4        any time when required to do so, information including 5        financial information pertaining to the activities of 6        the school required for the administration of this Act 7        and the standards and rules adopted under this Act;8            c. To utilize only advertising and solicitation 9        which is free from misrepresentation, deception, 10        fraud, or other misleading or unfair trade practices;11            d. To screen applicants to the school prior to 12        enrollment pursuant to the requirements of the 13        school's regional or national accrediting agency, if 14        any, and to maintain any and all records of such 15        screening. If the course of instruction is offered in 16        a language other than English, the screening shall 17        also be performed in that language;18            e. To post in a conspicuous place a statement, 19        developed by the Department, of student's rights 20        provided under this Act.21        4. The applicant shall establish to the satisfaction 22    of the Department that the owner possesses sufficient 23    liquid assets to meet the prospective expenses of the 24    school for a period of 3 months. In the discretion of the 25    Department, additional proof of financial ability may be 26    required.  SB2348- 21 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1        5. The applicant shall comply with all rules of the 2    Department determining the necessary curriculum and 3    equipment required for the conduct of the school.4        6. The applicant must demonstrate employment of a 5    sufficient number of qualified teachers who are holders of 6    a current license issued by the Department.7        7. A final inspection of the barber, cosmetology, 8    esthetics, hair braiding, or nail technology school shall 9    be made by the Department before the school may commence 10    classes.11        8. A written inspection report must be made by the 12    State Fire Marshal or a local fire authority approving the 13    use of the proposed premises as a barber, cosmetology, 14    esthetics, hair braiding, or nail technology school. 15(Source: P.A. 98-238, eff. 1-1-14; 98-911, eff. 1-1-15; 1699-427, eff. 8-21-15.) 17    (225 ILCS 410/3B-11)18    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)19    Sec. 3B-11. Periodic review of barber, cosmetology, 20esthetics, hair braiding, and nail technology schools. All 21approved schools and courses of instruction are subject to 22review by the Department. The review shall include 23consideration of a comparison between the graduation or 24completion rate for the school and the graduation or 25completion rate for the schools within that classification of   SB2348- 22 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1schools. Consideration shall be given to complaints and 2information forwarded to the Department by the Federal Trade 3Commission, Better Business Bureaus, the Illinois Attorney 4General's Office, a State's Attorney's Office, other State or 5official approval agencies, local school officials, and 6interested persons. The Department shall investigate all 7complaints filed with the Department about a school or its 8sales representatives.9    A school shall retain the records, as defined by rule, of a 10student who withdraws from or drops out of the school, by 11written notice of cancellation or otherwise, for any period 12longer than 7 years from the student's first day of 13attendance. However, a school shall retain indefinitely the 14transcript of each student who completes the program and 15graduates from the school.16(Source: P.A. 98-911, eff. 1-1-15; 99-427, eff. 8-21-15.) 17    (225 ILCS 410/3B-12)18    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)19    Sec. 3B-12. Enrollment agreements. 20    (a) Enrollment agreements shall be used by barber, 21cosmetology, esthetics, hair braiding, and nail technology 22schools licensed to operate by the Department and shall 23include the following written disclosures:24        (1) The name and address of the school and the 25    addresses where instruction will be given;  SB2348- 23 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1        (2) The name and description of the course of 2    instruction, including the number of clock hours in each 3    course and an approximate number of weeks or months 4    required for completion;5        (3) The scheduled starting date and calculated 6    completion date;7        (4) The total cost of the course of instruction 8    including any charges made by the school for tuition, 9    books, materials, supplies, and other expenses;10        (5) A clear and conspicuous statement that the 11    contract is a legally binding instrument when signed by 12    the student and accepted by the school;13        (6) A clear and conspicuous caption, "BUYER'S RIGHT TO 14    CANCEL" under which it is explained that the student has 15    the right to cancel the initial enrollment agreement until 16    midnight of the fifth business day after the student has 17    been enrolled; and if notice of the right to cancel is not 18    given to any prospective student at the time the 19    enrollment agreement is signed, then the student has the 20    right to cancel the agreement at any time and receive a 21    refund of all monies paid to date within 10 days of 22    cancellation;23        (7) A notice to the students that the cancellation 24    must be in writing and given to the registered agent, if 25    any, or managing employee of the school;26        (8) The school's refund policy for unearned tuition,   SB2348- 24 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1    fees, and other charges;2        (9) The date of the student's signature and the date 3    of the student's admission;4        (10) The name of the school employee or agent 5    responsible for procuring, soliciting, or enrolling the 6    student;7        (11) A clear statement that the institution does not 8    guarantee employment and a statement describing the 9    school's placement assistance procedures;10        (12) The graduation requirements of the school;11        (13) The contents of the following notice, in at least 12    10 point bold type:13"NOTICE TO THE STUDENT"14    "Do not sign this contract before you read it or if it 15    contains any blank space. You are entitled to an exact 16    copy of the contract you sign."17        (14) A statement either in the enrollment agreement or 18    separately provided and acknowledged by the student 19    indicating the number of students who did not complete the 20    course of instruction for which they enrolled for the past 21    calendar year as compared to the number of students who 22    enrolled in school during the school's past calendar year;23        (15) The following clear and conspicuous caption: 24    "COMPLAINTS AGAINST THIS SCHOOL MAY BE REGISTERED WITH THE 25    DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL AND PROFESSIONAL REGULATION", set 26    forth with the address and telephone number of the   SB2348- 25 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1    Department's Complaint Intake Unit.2    (b) If the enrollment is negotiated orally in a language 3other than English, then copies of the above disclosures shall 4be tendered in the language in which the contract was 5negotiated prior to executing the enrollment agreement.6    (c) The school shall comply with all applicable 7requirements of the Retail Installment Sales Act in its 8enrollment agreement or student contracts.9    (d) No enrollment agreement or student contract shall 10contain a wage assignment provision or a confession of 11judgment clause.12    (e) Any provision in an enrollment agreement or student 13contract that purports to waive the student's right to assert 14against the school, or any assignee, any claim or defense he or 15she may have against the school arising under the contract 16shall be void.17    (f) Two copies of the enrollment agreement shall be signed 18by the student. One copy shall be given to the student and the 19school shall retain the other copy as part of the student's 20permanent record.21(Source: P.A. 98-911, eff. 1-1-15; 99-427, eff. 8-21-15.) 22    (225 ILCS 410/3B-15)23    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)24    Sec. 3B-15. Grounds for disciplinary action. In addition 25to any other cause herein set forth the Department may refuse   SB2348- 26 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1to issue or renew and may suspend, place on probation, or 2revoke any license to operate a school, or take any other 3disciplinary or non-disciplinary action that the Department 4may deem proper, including the imposition of fines not to 5exceed $5,000 for each violation, for any one or any 6combination of the following causes:7        (1) Repeated violation of any provision of this Act or 8    any standard or rule established under this Act.9        (2) Knowingly furnishing false, misleading, or 10    incomplete information to the Department or failure to 11    furnish information requested by the Department.12        (3) Violation of any commitment made in an application 13    for a license, including failure to maintain standards 14    that are the same as, or substantially equivalent to, 15    those represented in the school's applications and 16    advertising.17        (4) Presenting to prospective students information 18    relating to the school, or to employment opportunities or 19    opportunities for enrollment in institutions of higher 20    learning after entering into or completing courses offered 21    by the school, that is false, misleading, or fraudulent.22        (5) Failure to provide premises or equipment or to 23    maintain them in a safe and sanitary condition as required 24    by law.25        (6) Failure to maintain financial resources adequate 26    for the satisfactory conduct of the courses of instruction   SB2348- 27 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1    offered or to retain a sufficient and qualified 2    instructional and administrative staff.3        (7) Refusal to admit applicants on account of race, 4    color, creed, sex, physical or mental disability unrelated 5    to ability, religion, or national origin.6        (8) Paying a commission or valuable consideration to 7    any person for acts or services performed in violation of 8    this Act.9        (9) Attempting to confer a fraudulent degree, diploma, 10    or certificate upon a student.11        (10) Failure to correct any deficiency or act of 12    noncompliance under this Act or the standards and rules 13    established under this Act within reasonable time limits 14    set by the Department.15        (11) Conduct of business or instructional services 16    other than at locations approved by the Department.17        (12) Failure to make all of the disclosures or making 18    inaccurate disclosures to the Department or in the 19    enrollment agreement as required under this Act.20        (13) Failure to make appropriate refunds as required 21    by this Act.22        (14) Denial, loss, or withdrawal of accreditation by 23    any accrediting agency.24        (15) During any calendar year, having a failure rate 25    of 25% or greater for those of its students who for the 26    first time take the examination authorized by the   SB2348- 28 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1    Department to determine fitness to receive a license as a 2    barber, barber teacher, cosmetologist, cosmetology 3    teacher, esthetician, esthetician teacher, hair braider, 4    hair braiding teacher, nail technician, or nail technology 5    teacher, provided that a student who transfers into the 6    school having completed 50% or more of the required 7    program and who takes the examination during that calendar 8    year shall not be counted for purposes of determining the 9    school's failure rate on an examination, without regard to 10    whether that transfer student passes or fails the 11    examination.12        (16) Failure to maintain a written record indicating 13    the funds received per student and funds paid out per 14    student. Such records shall be maintained for a minimum of 15    7 years and shall be made available to the Department upon 16    request. Such records shall identify the funding source 17    and amount for any student who has enrolled as well as any 18    other item set forth by rule.19        (17) Failure to maintain a copy of the student record 20    as defined by rule.21(Source: P.A. 98-911, eff. 1-1-15; 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.) 22    (225 ILCS 410/3B-16)23    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)24    Sec. 3B-16. Department of Corrections. The Secretary may 25waive any requirement of this Act or of the rules enacted by   SB2348- 29 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1the Department pursuant to this Act pertaining to the 2operation of a barber, cosmetology, esthetics, hair braiding, 3or nail technology school owned or operated by the Department 4of Corrections and located in a correctional facility to 5educate inmates that is inconsistent with the mission or 6operations of the Department of Corrections or is detrimental 7to the safety and security of any correctional facility. 8Nothing in this Section 3B-16 exempts the Department of 9Corrections from the necessity of licensure.10(Source: P.A. 98-911, eff. 1-1-15.) 11    (225 ILCS 410/3C-8)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1703C-8)12    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)13    Sec. 3C-8. License renewal; expiration; continuing 14education; persons in military service. The holder of a 15license issued under this Article may renew that license 16during the month preceding the expiration date of the license 17by paying the required fee and giving evidence, as the 18Department may prescribe, of completing not less than 10 hours 19of continuing education for a nail technician and 20 hours of 20continuing education for a nail technology teacher, within the 212 years prior to renewal. The continuing education shall be in 22subjects approved by the Department upon recommendation of the 23Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair Braiding, and Nail 24Technology Board relating to the practice of nail technology, 25including, but not limited to, review of sanitary procedures,   SB2348- 30 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1review of chemical service procedures, review of this Act, and 2review of the Workers' Compensation Act. However, at least 10 3of the hours of continuing education required for a nail 4technology teacher shall be in subjects relating to teaching 5methodology, educational psychology, and classroom management 6or in other subjects related to teaching. 7    For the initial renewal of a nail technician's license 8which requires continuing education, as prescribed by rule, 9one hour of the continuing education shall include domestic 10violence and sexual assault awareness education as prescribed 11by rule of the Department. For every subsequent renewal of a 12nail technician's license, one hour of the continuing 13education may include domestic violence and sexual assault 14awareness education as prescribed by rule of the Department. 15The one-hour domestic violence and sexual assault awareness 16continuing education course shall be provided by a continuing 17education provider approved by the Department, except that 18completion from March 12, 2016 to March 15, 2016 of a one-hour 19domestic violence and sexual assault awareness course from a 20domestic violence and sexual assault awareness organization 21shall satisfy this requirement.22    The Department may prescribe rules regarding the 23requirements for domestic violence and sexual assault 24awareness continuing education courses and teachers. 25    The Department, in its discretion, may waive enforcement 26of the continuing education requirement in this Section,   SB2348- 31 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1including the domestic violence and sexual assault awareness 2education requirement, and shall adopt rules defining the 3standards and criteria for such waiver, under the following 4circumstances:5        (a) the licensee resides in a locality where it is 6    demonstrated that the absence of opportunities for such 7    education would interfere with the ability of the licensee 8    to provide service to the public;9        (b) the licensee's compliance with the continuing 10    education requirements would cause a substantial financial 11    hardship on the licensee;12        (c) the licensee is serving in the United States Armed 13    Forces; or14        (d) the licensee is incapacitated due to illness.15(Source: P.A. 98-911, eff. 1-1-15; 99-427, eff. 8-21-15; 1699-766, eff. 1-1-17.) 17    (225 ILCS 410/Art. IIID heading)18ARTICLE IIID. COSMETOLOGY, ESTHETICS, HAIR BRAIDING, 19AND NAIL TECHNOLOGY SALONS AND BARBER SHOPS20(Source: P.A. 96-1246, eff. 1-1-11.) 21    (225 ILCS 410/3D-5)22    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)23    Sec. 3D-5. Requisites for ownership or operation of 24cosmetology, esthetics, hair braiding, and nail technology   SB2348- 32 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1salons and barber shops.2    (a) No person, firm, partnership, limited liability 3company, or corporation shall own or operate a cosmetology, 4esthetics, hair braiding, or nail technology salon or barber 5shop or employ, rent space to, or independently contract with 6any licensee under this Act without applying on forms provided 7by the Department for a certificate of registration.8    (b) The application for a certificate of registration 9under this Section shall set forth the name, address, and 10telephone number of the proposed cosmetology, esthetics, hair 11braiding, or nail technology salon or barber shop; the name, 12address, and telephone number of the person, firm, 13partnership, or corporation that is to own or operate the 14salon or shop; and, if the salon or shop is to be owned or 15operated by an entity other than an individual, the name, 16address, and telephone number of the managing partner or the 17chief executive officer of the corporation or other entity 18that owns or operates the salon or shop.19    (c) The Department shall be notified by the owner or 20operator of a salon or shop that is moved to a new location. If 21there is a change in the ownership or operation of a salon or 22shop, the new owner or operator shall report that change to the 23Department along with completion of any additional 24requirements set forth by rule.25    (d) If a person, firm, partnership, limited liability 26company, or corporation owns or operates more than one shop or   SB2348- 33 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1salon, a separate certificate of registration must be obtained 2for each salon or shop.3    (e) A certificate of registration granted under this 4Section may be revoked in accordance with the provisions of 5Article IV and the holder of the certificate may be otherwise 6disciplined by the Department in accordance with rules adopted 7under this Act.8    (f) The Department may promulgate rules to establish 9additional requirements for owning or operating a salon or 10shop.11    (g) The requirement of a certificate of registration as 12set forth in this Section shall also apply to any person, firm, 13partnership, limited liability company, or corporation 14providing barbering, cosmetology, esthetics, hair braiding, or 15nail technology services at any location not owned or rented 16by such person, firm, partnership, limited liability company, 17or corporation for these purposes or from a mobile shop or 18salon. Notwithstanding any provision of this Section, 19applicants for a certificate of registration under this 20subsection (g) shall report in its application the address and 21telephone number of its office and shall not be required to 22report the location where services are or will be rendered. 23Nothing in this subsection (g) shall apply to a sole 24proprietor who has no employees or contractors and is not 25operating a mobile shop or salon. 26(Source: P.A. 99-427, eff. 8-21-15.)   SB2348- 34 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1    (225 ILCS 410/4-1)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)3    Sec. 4-1. Powers and duties of Department. The Department 4shall exercise, subject to the provisions of this Act, the 5following functions, powers and duties:6        (1) To cause to be conducted examinations to ascertain 7    the qualifications and fitness of applicants for licensure 8    as cosmetologists, estheticians, nail technicians, hair 9    braiders, or barbers and as cosmetology, esthetics, nail 10    technology, hair braiding, or barber teachers.11        (2) To determine the qualifications for licensure as 12    (i) a cosmetologist, esthetician, nail technician, hair 13    braider, or barber, or (ii) a cosmetology, esthetics, nail 14    technology, hair braiding, or barber teacher, or (iii) a 15    cosmetology clinic teacher for persons currently holding 16    similar licenses outside the State of Illinois or the 17    continental U.S.18        (3) To prescribe rules for:19            (i) The method of examination of candidates for 20        licensure as a cosmetologist, esthetician, nail 21        technician, hair braider, or barber or cosmetology, 22        esthetics, nail technology, hair braiding, or barber 23        teacher.24            (ii) Minimum standards as to what constitutes an 25        approved cosmetology, esthetics, nail technology, hair   SB2348- 35 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1        braiding, or barber school.2        (4) To conduct investigations or hearings on 3    proceedings to determine disciplinary action.4        (5) To prescribe reasonable rules governing the 5    sanitary regulation and inspection of cosmetology, 6    esthetics, nail technology, hair braiding, or barber 7    schools, salons, or shops.8        (6) To prescribe reasonable rules for the method of 9    renewal for each license as a cosmetologist, esthetician, 10    nail technician, hair braider, or barber or cosmetology, 11    esthetics, nail technology, hair braiding, or barber 12    teacher or cosmetology clinic teacher.13        (7) To prescribe reasonable rules for the method of 14    registration, the issuance, fees, renewal and discipline 15    of a certificate of registration for the ownership or 16    operation of cosmetology, esthetics, hair braiding, and 17    nail technology salons and barber shops.18        (8) To adopt rules concerning sanitation requirements, 19    requirements for education on sanitation, and any other 20    health concerns associated with threading. 21(Source: P.A. 97-333, eff. 8-12-11; 98-911, eff. 1-1-15.) 22    (225 ILCS 410/4-2)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1704-2)23    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)24    Sec. 4-2. The Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair 25Braiding, and Nail Technology Board. There is established   SB2348- 36 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1within the Department the Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair 2Braiding, and Nail Technology Board, composed of 11 persons, 3which shall serve in an advisory capacity to the Secretary in 4all matters related to the practice of barbering, cosmetology, 5esthetics, hair braiding, and nail technology.6    The 11 members of the Board shall be appointed as follows: 76 licensed cosmetologists, all of whom hold a current license 8as a cosmetologist or cosmetology teacher and, for 9appointments made after the effective date of this amendatory 10Act of 1996, at least 2 of whom shall be an owner of or a major 11stockholder in a school of cosmetology, 2 of whom shall be 12representatives of either a franchiser or an owner operating 13salons in 2 or more locations within the State, one of whom 14shall be an independent salon owner, and no one of the 15cosmetologist members shall be a manufacturer, jobber, or 16stockholder in a factory of cosmetology articles or an 17immediate family member of any of the above; one of whom shall 18be a barber holding a current license; one member who shall be 19a licensed esthetician or esthetics teacher; one member who 20shall be a licensed nail technician or nail technology 21teacher; one member who shall be licensed cosmetologist, 22barber, nail technician, esthetician, or a licensed 23cosmetology, barber, esthetics, or nail technology teacher; 24one member who shall be a licensed hair braider or hair 25braiding teacher; and one public member who holds no licenses 26issued by the Department. The Secretary shall give due   SB2348- 37 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1consideration for membership to recommendations by members of 2the professions and by their professional organizations. 3Members shall serve 4 year terms and until their successors 4are appointed and qualified. No member shall be reappointed to 5the Board for more than 2 terms. Appointments to fill 6vacancies shall be made in the same manner as original 7appointments for the unexpired portion of the vacated term. 8Members of the Board in office on the effective date of this 9amendatory Act of 1996 shall continue to serve for the 10duration of the terms to which they have been appointed, but 11beginning on that effective date all appointments of licensed 12cosmetologists and barbers to serve as members of the Board 13shall be made in a manner that will effect at the earliest 14possible date the changes made by this amendatory Act of 1996 15in the representative composition of the Board.16    For the initial appointment of a member who shall be a hair 17braider or hair braiding teacher to the Board, such individual 18shall not be required to possess a license at the time of 19appointment, but shall have at least 5 years active practice 20in the field of hair braiding and shall obtain a license as a 21hair braider or a hair braiding teacher within 18 months after 22appointment to the Board. 23    Six members of the Board shall constitute a quorum. A 24majority is required for Board decisions.25    The Board shall elect a chairperson and a vice chairperson 26annually.  SB2348- 38 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1    Board members are not liable for their acts, omissions, 2decisions, or other conduct in connection with their duties on 3the Board, except those determined to be willful, wanton, or 4intentional misconduct. 5(Source: P.A. 99-427, eff. 8-21-15.) 6    (225 ILCS 410/4-4)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1704-4)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)8    Sec. 4-4. Issuance of license. Whenever the provisions of 9this Act have been complied with, the Department shall issue a 10license as a cosmetologist, esthetician, nail technician, hair 11braider, or barber, a license as a cosmetology, esthetics, 12nail technology, hair braiding, or barber teacher, or a 13license as a cosmetology clinic teacher as the case may be.14(Source: P.A. 98-911, eff. 1-1-15.) 15    (225 ILCS 410/4-6.1)16    Sec. 4-6.1. Applicant convictions. 17    (a) When reviewing a conviction by plea of guilty or nolo 18contendere, finding of guilt, jury verdict, or entry of 19judgment or by sentencing of an initial applicant, the 20Department may only deny a license based upon consideration of 21mitigating factors provided in subsection (c) of this Section 22for a felony directly related to the practice of cosmetology, 23esthetics, hair braiding, nail technology, and barbering.24    (b) The following crimes or similar offenses in any other   SB2348- 39 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1jurisdiction are hereby deemed directly related to the 2practice of cosmetology, esthetics, hair braiding, nail 3technology, and barbering:4        (1) first degree murder;5        (2) second degree murder;6        (3) drug induced homicide;7        (4) unlawful restraint;8        (5) aggravated unlawful restraint;9        (6) forcible detention;10        (7) involuntary servitude;11        (8) involuntary sexual servitude of a minor;12        (9) predatory criminal sexual assault of a child;13        (10) aggravated criminal sexual assault;14        (11) criminal sexual assault;15        (12) criminal sexual abuse;16        (13) aggravated kidnaping;17        (14) aggravated robbery;18        (15) armed robbery;19        (16) kidnapping;20        (17) aggravated battery;21        (18) aggravated vehicular hijacking;22        (19) terrorism;23        (20) causing a catastrophe;24        (21) possession of a deadly substance;25        (22) making a terrorist threat;26        (23) material support for terrorism;  SB2348- 40 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1        (24) hindering prosecution of terrorism;2        (25) armed violence;3        (26) any felony based on consumer fraud or deceptive 4    business practices under the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive 5    Business Practices Act;6        (27) any felony requiring registration as a sex 7    offender under the Sex Offender Registration Act;8        (28) attempt of any the offenses set forth in 9    paragraphs (1) through (27) of this subsection (b); and10        (29) convictions set forth in Section 4-20 of this 11    Act.12    (c) The Department shall consider any mitigating factors 13contained in the record, when determining the appropriate 14disciplinary sanction, if any, to be imposed. In addition to 15those set forth in Section 2105-130 of the Department of 16Professional Regulation Law of the Civil Administrative Code 17of Illinois, mitigating factors shall include the following:18        (1) the bearing, if any, the criminal offense or 19    offenses for which the person was previously convicted 20    will have on his or her fitness or ability to perform one 21    or more such duties and responsibilities;22        (2) the time that has elapsed since the criminal 23    conviction; and24        (3) the age of the person at the time of the criminal 25    conviction.26    (d) The Department shall issue an annual report by January   SB2348- 41 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b131, 2018 and by January 31 each year thereafter, indicating 2the following:3        (1) the number of initial applicants for a license 4    under this Act within the preceding calendar year;5        (2) the number of initial applicants for a license 6    under this Act within the previous calendar year who had a 7    conviction;8        (3) the number of applicants with a conviction who 9    were granted a license under this Act within the previous 10    year;11        (4) the number of applicants denied a license under 12    this Act within the preceding calendar year; and13        (5) the number of applicants denied a license under 14    this Act solely on the basis of a conviction within the 15    preceding calendar year.16    (e) Nothing in this Section shall prevent the Department 17taking disciplinary or non-disciplinary action against a 18license as set forth in paragraph (2) of subsection (1) of 19Section 4-7 of this Act. 20(Source: P.A. 99-876, eff. 1-1-17.) 21    (225 ILCS 410/4-7)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1704-7)22    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)23    Sec. 4-7. Refusal, suspension and revocation of licenses; 24causes; disciplinary action.25    (1) The Department may refuse to issue or renew, and may   SB2348- 42 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1suspend, revoke, place on probation, reprimand or take any 2other disciplinary or non-disciplinary action as the 3Department may deem proper, including civil penalties not to 4exceed $500 for each violation, with regard to any license for 5any one, or any combination, of the following causes:6        a. For licensees, conviction of any crime under the 7    laws of the United States or any state or territory 8    thereof that is (i) a felony, (ii) a misdemeanor, an 9    essential element of which is dishonesty, or (iii) a crime 10    which is related to the practice of the profession and, 11    for initial applicants, convictions set forth in Section 12    4-6.1 of this Act. 13        b. Conviction of any of the violations listed in 14    Section 4-20.15        c. Material misstatement in furnishing information to 16    the Department.17        d. Making any misrepresentation for the purpose of 18    obtaining a license or violating any provision of this Act 19    or its rules. 20        e. Aiding or assisting another person in violating any 21    provision of this Act or its rules.22        f. Failing, within 60 days, to provide information in 23    response to a written request made by the Department.24        g. Discipline by another state, territory, or country 25    if at least one of the grounds for the discipline is the 26    same as or substantially equivalent to those set forth in   SB2348- 43 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1    this Act.2        h. Practice in the barber, nail technology, esthetics, 3    hair braiding, or cosmetology profession, or an attempt to 4    practice in those professions, by fraudulent 5    misrepresentation.6        i. Gross malpractice or gross incompetency.7        j. Continued practice by a person knowingly having an 8    infectious or contagious disease.9        k. Solicitation of professional services by using 10    false or misleading advertising.11        l. A finding by the Department that the licensee, 12    after having his or her license placed on probationary 13    status, has violated the terms of probation.14        m. Directly or indirectly giving to or receiving from 15    any person, firm, corporation, partnership or association 16    any fee, commission, rebate, or other form of compensation 17    for any professional services not actually or personally 18    rendered.19        n. Violating any of the provisions of this Act or 20    rules adopted pursuant to this Act.21        o. Willfully making or filing false records or reports 22    relating to a licensee's practice, including but not 23    limited to, false records filed with State agencies or 24    departments.25        p. Habitual or excessive use or addiction to alcohol, 26    narcotics, stimulants, or any other chemical agent or drug   SB2348- 44 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1    that results in the inability to practice with reasonable 2    judgment, skill or safety.3        q. Engaging in dishonorable, unethical or 4    unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, 5    defraud, or harm the public as may be defined by rules of 6    the Department, or violating the rules of professional 7    conduct which may be adopted by the Department.8        r. Permitting any person to use for any unlawful or 9    fraudulent purpose one's diploma or license or certificate 10    of registration as a cosmetologist, nail technician, 11    esthetician, hair braider, or barber or cosmetology, nail 12    technology, esthetics, hair braiding, or barber teacher or 13    salon or shop or cosmetology clinic teacher.14        s. Being named as a perpetrator in an indicated report 15    by the Department of Children and Family Services under 16    the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act and upon 17    proof by clear and convincing evidence that the licensee 18    has caused a child to be an abused child or neglected child 19    as defined in the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting 20    Act.21        t. Operating a salon or shop without a valid 22    registration. 23        u. Failure to complete required continuing education 24    hours. 25    (2) In rendering an order, the Secretary shall take into 26consideration the facts and circumstances involving the type   SB2348- 45 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1of acts or omissions in paragraph (1) of this Section 2including, but not limited to:3        (a) the extent to which public confidence in the 4    cosmetology, nail technology, esthetics, hair braiding, or 5    barbering profession was, might have been, or may be, 6    injured;7        (b) the degree of trust and dependence among the 8    involved parties;9        (c) the character and degree of harm which did result 10    or might have resulted;11        (d) the intent or mental state of the licensee at the 12    time of the acts or omissions.13    (3) The Department may reissue the license or registration 14upon certification by the Board that the disciplined licensee 15or registrant has complied with all of the terms and 16conditions set forth in the final order or has been 17sufficiently rehabilitated to warrant the public trust.18    (4) The Department shall refuse to issue or renew or 19suspend without hearing the license or certificate of 20registration of any person who fails to file a return, or to 21pay the tax, penalty or interest shown in a filed return, or to 22pay any final assessment of tax, penalty or interest, as 23required by any tax Act administered by the Illinois 24Department of Revenue, until such time as the requirements of 25any such tax Act are satisfied as determined by the Department 26of Revenue.  SB2348- 46 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1    (5) (Blank).2    (6) All fines imposed under this Section shall be paid 3within 60 days after the effective date of the order imposing 4the fine or in accordance with the terms set forth in the order 5imposing the fine. 6(Source: P.A. 99-427, eff. 8-21-15; 99-876, eff. 1-1-17; 7100-872, eff. 8-14-18.) 8    (225 ILCS 410/4-9)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1704-9)9    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)10    Sec. 4-9. Practice without a license or after suspension 11or revocation thereof.12    (a) If any person violates the provisions of this Act, the 13Secretary may, in the name of the People of the State of 14Illinois, through the Attorney General of the State of 15Illinois, petition, for an order enjoining such violation or 16for an order enforcing compliance with this Act. Upon the 17filing of a verified petition in such court, the court may 18issue a temporary restraining order, without notice or bond, 19and may preliminarily and permanently enjoin such violation, 20and if it is established that such person has violated or is 21violating the injunction, the Court may punish the offender 22for contempt of court. Proceedings under this Section shall be 23in addition to, and not in lieu of, all other remedies and 24penalties provided by this Act.25    (b) If any person shall practice as a barber,   SB2348- 47 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1cosmetologist, nail technician, hair braider, or esthetician, 2or teacher thereof or cosmetology clinic teacher or hold 3himself or herself out as such without being licensed under 4the provisions of this Act, any licensee, any interested 5party, or any person injured thereby may, in addition to the 6Secretary, petition for relief as provided in subsection (a) 7of this Section.8    (c) Whenever in the opinion of the Department any person, 9firm, corporation, or other legal entity has violated any 10provision of Section 1-7 or 3D-5 of this Act, the Department 11may issue a rule to show cause why an order to cease and desist 12should not be entered against that person, firm, corporation, 13or legal entity. The rule shall clearly set forth the grounds 14relied upon by the Department and shall provide a period of 7 15days from the date of the rule to file an answer to the 16satisfaction of the Department. Failure to answer to the 17satisfaction of the Department shall cause an order to cease 18and desist to be issued immediately.19(Source: P.A. 98-911, eff. 1-1-15; 99-427, eff. 8-21-15.) 20    (225 ILCS 410/4-19)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1704-19)21    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)22    Sec. 4-19. Emergency suspension. The Secretary may 23temporarily suspend the license of a barber, cosmetologist, 24nail technician, hair braider, esthetician or teacher thereof 25or of a cosmetology clinic teacher without a hearing,   SB2348- 48 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1simultaneously with the institution of proceedings for a 2hearing provided for in Section 4-10 of this Act, if the 3Secretary finds that evidence in his possession indicates that 4the licensee's continuation in practice would constitute an 5imminent danger to the public. In the event that the Secretary 6suspends, temporarily, this license without a hearing, a 7hearing must be commenced within 30 days after such suspension 8has occurred.9(Source: P.A. 98-911, eff. 1-1-15.) 10    (225 ILCS 410/4-20)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1704-20)11    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)12    Sec. 4-20. Violations; penalties. Whoever violates any of 13the following shall, for the first offense, be guilty of a 14Class B misdemeanor; for the second offense, shall be guilty 15of a Class A misdemeanor; and for all subsequent offenses, 16shall be guilty of a Class 4 felony and be fined not less than 17$1,000 or more than $5,000.18    (1) The practice of cosmetology, nail technology, 19esthetics, hair braiding, or barbering or an attempt to 20practice cosmetology, nail technology, esthetics, hair 21braiding, or barbering without a license as a cosmetologist, 22nail technician, esthetician, hair braider, or barber; or the 23practice or attempt to practice as a cosmetology, nail 24technology, esthetics, hair braiding, or barber teacher 25without a license as a cosmetology, nail technology,   SB2348- 49 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1esthetics, hair braiding, or barber teacher; or the practice 2or attempt to practice as a cosmetology clinic teacher without 3a proper license.4    (2) The obtaining of or an attempt to obtain a license or 5money or any other thing of value by fraudulent 6misrepresentation.7    (3) Practice in the barber, nail technology, cosmetology, 8hair braiding, or esthetic profession, or an attempt to 9practice in those professions, by fraudulent 10misrepresentation.11    (4) Wilfully making any false oath or affirmation whenever 12an oath or affirmation is required by this Act.13    (5) The violation of any of the provisions of this Act.14(Source: P.A. 98-911, eff. 1-1-15.) 15    (225 ILCS 410/Art. IIIE rep.)16    Section 20. The Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair 17Braiding, and Nail Technology Act of 1985 is amended by 18repealing Article IIIE. 19    Section 25. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 20changing Section 5-5-5 as follows: 21    (730 ILCS 5/5-5-5)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1005-5-5)22    Sec. 5-5-5. Loss and restoration of rights. 23    (a) Conviction and disposition shall not entail the loss   SB2348- 50 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1by the defendant of any civil rights, except under this 2Section and Sections 29-6 and 29-10 of The Election Code, as 3now or hereafter amended.4    (b) A person convicted of a felony shall be ineligible to 5hold an office created by the Constitution of this State until 6the completion of his sentence.7    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person 8convicted of a felony, bribery, perjury, or other infamous 9crime for an offense committed on or after the effective date 10of this amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly and 11committed while he or she was serving as a public official in 12this State is ineligible to hold any local public office or any 13office created by the Constitution of this State unless the 14person's conviction is reversed, the person is again restored 15to such rights by the terms of a pardon for the offense, the 16person has received a restoration of rights by the Governor, 17or the person's rights are otherwise restored by law.18    (c) A person sentenced to imprisonment shall lose his 19right to vote until released from imprisonment.20    (d) On completion of sentence of imprisonment or upon 21discharge from probation, conditional discharge or periodic 22imprisonment, or at any time thereafter, all license rights 23and privileges granted under the authority of this State which 24have been revoked or suspended because of conviction of an 25offense shall be restored unless the authority having 26jurisdiction of such license rights finds after investigation   SB2348- 51 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1and hearing that restoration is not in the public interest. 2This paragraph (d) shall not apply to the suspension or 3revocation of a license to operate a motor vehicle under the 4Illinois Vehicle Code.5    (e) Upon a person's discharge from incarceration or 6parole, or upon a person's discharge from probation or at any 7time thereafter, the committing court may enter an order 8certifying that the sentence has been satisfactorily completed 9when the court believes it would assist in the rehabilitation 10of the person and be consistent with the public welfare. Such 11order may be entered upon the motion of the defendant or the 12State or upon the court's own motion.13    (f) Upon entry of the order, the court shall issue to the 14person in whose favor the order has been entered a certificate 15stating that his behavior after conviction has warranted the 16issuance of the order.17    (g) This Section shall not affect the right of a defendant 18to collaterally attack his conviction or to rely on it in bar 19of subsequent proceedings for the same offense.20    (h) No application for any license specified in subsection 21(i) of this Section granted under the authority of this State 22shall be denied by reason of an eligible offender who has 23obtained a certificate of relief from disabilities, as defined 24in Article 5.5 of this Chapter, having been previously 25convicted of one or more criminal offenses, or by reason of a 26finding of lack of "good moral character" when the finding is   SB2348- 52 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1based upon the fact that the applicant has previously been 2convicted of one or more criminal offenses, unless:3        (1) there is a direct relationship between one or more 4    of the previous criminal offenses and the specific license 5    sought; or6        (2) the issuance of the license would involve an 7    unreasonable risk to property or to the safety or welfare 8    of specific individuals or the general public.9    In making such a determination, the licensing agency shall 10consider the following factors:11        (1) the public policy of this State, as expressed in 12    Article 5.5 of this Chapter, to encourage the licensure 13    and employment of persons previously convicted of one or 14    more criminal offenses;15        (2) the specific duties and responsibilities 16    necessarily related to the license being sought;17        (3) the bearing, if any, the criminal offenses or 18    offenses for which the person was previously convicted 19    will have on his or her fitness or ability to perform one 20    or more such duties and responsibilities;21        (4) the time which has elapsed since the occurrence of 22    the criminal offense or offenses;23        (5) the age of the person at the time of occurrence of 24    the criminal offense or offenses;25        (6) the seriousness of the offense or offenses;26        (7) any information produced by the person or produced   SB2348- 53 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1    on his or her behalf in regard to his or her rehabilitation 2    and good conduct, including a certificate of relief from 3    disabilities issued to the applicant, which certificate 4    shall create a presumption of rehabilitation in regard to 5    the offense or offenses specified in the certificate; and6        (8) the legitimate interest of the licensing agency in 7    protecting property, and the safety and welfare of 8    specific individuals or the general public.9    (i) A certificate of relief from disabilities shall be 10issued only for a license or certification issued under the 11following Acts:12        (1) the Animal Welfare Act; except that a certificate 13    of relief from disabilities may not be granted to provide 14    for the issuance or restoration of a license under the 15    Animal Welfare Act for any person convicted of violating 16    Section 3, 3.01, 3.02, 3.03, 3.03-1, or 4.01 of the Humane 17    Care for Animals Act or Section 26-5 or 48-1 of the 18    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012;19        (2) the Illinois Athletic Trainers Practice Act;20        (3) the Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair Braiding, 21    and Nail Technology Act of 1985;22        (4) the Boiler and Pressure Vessel Repairer Regulation 23    Act;24        (5) the Boxing and Full-contact Martial Arts Act;25        (6) the Illinois Certified Shorthand Reporters Act of 26    1984;  SB2348- 54 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1        (7) the Illinois Farm Labor Contractor Certification 2    Act;3        (8) the Registered Interior Designers Act;4        (9) the Illinois Professional Land Surveyor Act of 5    1989;6        (10) the Landscape Architecture Registration Act;7        (11) the Marriage and Family Therapy Licensing Act;8        (12) the Private Employment Agency Act;9        (13) the Professional Counselor and Clinical 10    Professional Counselor Licensing and Practice Act;11        (14) the Real Estate License Act of 2000;12        (15) the Illinois Roofing Industry Licensing Act;13        (16) the Professional Engineering Practice Act of 14    1989;15        (17) the Water Well and Pump Installation Contractor's 16    License Act;17        (18) the Electrologist Licensing Act; 18        (19) the Auction License Act;19        (20) the Illinois Architecture Practice Act of 1989;20        (21) the Dietitian Nutritionist Practice Act;21        (22) the Environmental Health Practitioner Licensing 22    Act;23        (23) the Funeral Directors and Embalmers Licensing 24    Code;25        (24) (blank);26        (25) the Professional Geologist Licensing Act;  SB2348- 55 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1        (26) the Illinois Public Accounting Act; and2        (27) the Structural Engineering Practice Act of 1989.3(Source: P.A. 102-284, eff. 8-6-21; 103-562, eff. 11-17-23.) 4    Section 30. The Human Trafficking Resource Center Notice 5Act is amended by changing Section 5 as follows: 6    (775 ILCS 50/5)7    Sec. 5. Posted notice required. 8    (a) Each of the following businesses and other 9establishments shall, upon the availability of the model 10notice described in Section 15 of this Act, post a notice that 11complies with the requirements of this Act in a conspicuous 12place near the public entrance of the establishment, in all 13restrooms open to the public, or in another conspicuous 14location in clear view of the public and employees where 15similar notices are customarily posted:16        (1) On premise consumption retailer licensees under 17    the Liquor Control Act of 1934 where the sale of alcoholic 18    liquor is the principal business carried on by the 19    licensee at the premises and primary to the sale of food.20        (2) Adult entertainment facilities, as defined in 21    Section 5-1097.5 of the Counties Code.22        (3) Primary airports, as defined in Section 47102(16) 23    of Title 49 of the United States Code.24        (4) Intercity passenger rail or light rail stations.  SB2348- 56 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1        (5) Bus stations.2        (6) Truck stops. For purposes of this Act, "truck 3    stop" means a privately-owned and operated facility that 4    provides food, fuel, shower or other sanitary facilities, 5    and lawful overnight truck parking.6        (7) Emergency rooms within general acute care 7    hospitals, in which case the notice may be posted by 8    electronic means.9        (8) Urgent care centers, in which case the notice may 10    be posted by electronic means.11        (9) Farm labor contractors. For purposes of this Act, 12    "farm labor contractor" means: (i) any person who for a 13    fee or other valuable consideration recruits, supplies, or 14    hires, or transports in connection therewith, into or 15    within the State, any farmworker not of the contractor's 16    immediate family to work for, or under the direction, 17    supervision, or control of, a third person; or (ii) any 18    person who for a fee or other valuable consideration 19    recruits, supplies, or hires, or transports in connection 20    therewith, into or within the State, any farmworker not of 21    the contractor's immediate family, and who for a fee or 22    other valuable consideration directs, supervises, or 23    controls all or any part of the work of the farmworker or 24    who disburses wages to the farmworker. However, "farm 25    labor contractor" does not include full-time regular 26    employees of food processing companies when the employees   SB2348- 57 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1    are engaged in recruiting for the companies if those 2    employees are not compensated according to the number of 3    farmworkers they recruit.4        (10) Privately-operated job recruitment centers.5        (11) Massage establishments. As used in this Act, 6    "massage establishment" means a place of business in which 7    any method of massage therapy is administered or practiced 8    for compensation. "Massage establishment" does not 9    include: an establishment at which persons licensed under 10    the Medical Practice Act of 1987, the Illinois Physical 11    Therapy Act, or the Naprapathic Practice Act engage in 12    practice under one of those Acts; a business owned by a 13    sole licensed massage therapist; or a cosmetology or 14    esthetics salon registered under the Barber, Cosmetology, 15    Esthetics, Hair Braiding, and Nail Technology Act of 1985.16    (b) The Department of Transportation shall, upon the 17availability of the model notice described in Section 15 of 18this Act, post a notice that complies with the requirements of 19this Act in a conspicuous place near the public entrance of 20each roadside rest area or in another conspicuous location in 21clear view of the public and employees where similar notices 22are customarily posted.23    (c) The owner of a hotel or motel shall, upon the 24availability of the model notice described in Section 15 of 25this Act, post a notice that complies with the requirements of 26this Act in a conspicuous and accessible place in or about the   SB2348- 58 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1premises in clear view of the employees where similar notices 2are customarily posted. 3    (d) The organizer of a public gathering or special event 4that is conducted on property open to the public and requires 5the issuance of a permit from the unit of local government 6shall post a notice that complies with the requirements of 7this Act in a conspicuous and accessible place in or about the 8premises in clear view of the public and employees where 9similar notices are customarily posted.10    (e) The administrator of a public or private elementary 11school or public or private secondary school shall post a 12printout of the downloadable notice provided by the Department 13of Human Services under Section 15 that complies with the 14requirements of this Act in a conspicuous and accessible place 15chosen by the administrator in the administrative office or 16another location in view of school employees. School districts 17and personnel are not subject to the penalties provided under 18subsection (a) of Section 20.19    (f) The owner of an establishment registered under the 20Tattoo and Body Piercing Establishment Registration Act shall 21post a notice that complies with the requirements of this Act 22in a conspicuous and accessible place in clear view of 23establishment employees.24(Source: P.A. 102-4, eff. 4-27-21; 102-131, eff. 1-1-22; 25102-813, eff. 5-13-22.)   SB2348- 59 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1    Section 35. The Child Labor Law of 2024 is amended by 2changing Section 40 as follows: 3    (820 ILCS 206/40)4    Sec. 40. Restrictions on employment of minors. 5    (a) No person shall employ, allow, or permit a minor to 6work: 7        (1) in any mechanic's garage, including garage pits, 8    repairing cars, trucks, or other vehicles or using garage 9    lifting racks;10        (2) in the oiling, cleaning, or wiping of machinery or 11    shafting;12        (3) in or about any mine or quarry;13        (4) in stone cutting or polishing;14        (5) in any factory work;15        (6) in or about any plant manufacturing explosives or 16    articles containing explosive components, or in the use or 17    transportation of same;18        (7) in or about plants manufacturing iron or steel, 19    ore reduction works, smelters, foundries, forging shops, 20    hot rolling mills or any other place in which the heating, 21    melting, or heat treatment of metals is carried on;22        (8) in the operation of machinery used in the cold 23    rolling of heavy metal stock, or in the operation of 24    power-driven punching, shearing, stamping, or metal plate 25    bending machines;  SB2348- 60 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1        (9) in or about logging, sawmills or lath, shingle, or 2    cooperage-stock mills;3        (10) in the operation of power-driven woodworking 4    machines, or off-bearing from circular saws;5        (11) in the operation and repair of freight elevators 6    or hoisting machines and cranes;7        (12) in spray painting;8        (13) in occupations involving exposure to lead or its 9    compounds;10        (14) in occupations involving exposure to acids, dyes, 11    chemicals, dust, gases, vapors, or fumes that are known or 12    suspected to be dangerous to humans;13        (15) in any occupation subject to the Amusement Ride 14    and Attraction Safety Act;15        (16) in oil refineries, gasoline blending plants, or 16    pumping stations on oil transmission lines;17        (17) in the operation of laundry, dry cleaning, or 18    dyeing machinery;19        (18) in occupations involving exposure to radioactive 20    substances;21        (19) in or about any filling station or service 22    station, except that this prohibition does not extend to 23    employment within attached convenience stores, food 24    service, or retail establishments;25        (20) in construction work, including demolition and 26    repair;  SB2348- 61 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1        (21) in any energy generation or transmission service;2        (22) in public and private utilities and related 3    services;4        (23) in operations in or in connection with 5    slaughtering, meat packing, poultry processing, and fish 6    and seafood processing;7        (24) in operations which involve working on an 8    elevated surface, with or without use of equipment, 9    including, but not limited to, ladders and scaffolds;10        (25) in security positions or any occupations that 11    require the use or carrying of a firearm or other weapon;12        (26) in occupations which involve the handling or 13    storage of human blood, human blood products, human body 14    fluids, or human body tissues;15        (27) in any mill, cannery, factory, workshop, or coal, 16    brick, or lumber yard;17        (28) any occupation which is prohibited for minors 18    under federal law; or19        (29) in any other occupation or working condition 20    determined by the Director to be hazardous.21    (b) No person shall employ, allow, or permit a minor to 22work at:23        (1) any cannabis business establishment subject to the 24    Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or Compassionate Use of 25    Medical Cannabis Program Act;26        (2) any establishment subject to the Live Adult   SB2348- 62 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1    Entertainment Facility Surcharge Act;2        (3) any firearm range or gun range used for 3    discharging a firearm in a sporting event, for practice or 4    instruction in the use of a firearm, or the testing of a 5    firearm;6        (4) any establishment in which items containing 7    alcohol for consumption are manufactured, distilled, 8    brewed, or bottled;9        (5) any establishment where the primary activity is 10    the sale of alcohol or tobacco;11        (6) an establishment operated by any holder of an 12    owners license subject to the Illinois Gambling Act; or13        (7) any other establishment which State or federal law 14    prohibits minors from entering or patronizing.15    (c) An employer shall not allow minors to draw, mix, pour, 16or serve any item containing alcohol or otherwise handle any 17open containers of alcohol. An employer shall make reasonable 18efforts to ensure that minors are unable to access alcohol.19    (d) An employer may allow minors aged 14 and 15 to work in 20retail stores, except that an employer shall not allow minors 21to handle or be able to access any goods or products which are 22illegal for minors to purchase or possess.23    (e) No person shall employ, allow, or permit an unlicensed 24minor to perform work in the practice of barber, cosmetology, 25esthetics, hair braiding, and nail technology services 26requiring a license under the Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics,   SB2348- 63 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1Hair Braiding, and Nail Technology Act of 1985, except for 2students enrolled in a school and performing barber, 3cosmetology, esthetics, hair braiding, and nail technology 4services in accordance with that Act and rules adopted under 5that Act.6    (f) A person may employ, allow, or permit a minor to 7perform office or administrative support work that does not 8expose the minor to the work prohibited in this Section.9(Source: P.A. 103-721, eff. 1-1-25.) 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.  SB2348- 64 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    5 ILCS 80/4.364    225 ILCS 57/305    225 ILCS 410/1-1from Ch. 111, par. 1701-16    225 ILCS 410/1-2from Ch. 111, par. 1701-27    225 ILCS 410/1-48    225 ILCS 410/1-7from Ch. 111, par. 1701-79    225 ILCS 410/1-7.510    225 ILCS 410/1-7.1011    225 ILCS 410/1-10from Ch. 111, par. 1701-1012    225 ILCS 410/1-11from Ch. 111, par. 1701-1113    225 ILCS 410/Art. IIIB 14    heading15    225 ILCS 410/3B-1from Ch. 111, par. 1703B-116    225 ILCS 410/3B-1017    225 ILCS 410/3B-1118    225 ILCS 410/3B-1219    225 ILCS 410/3B-1520    225 ILCS 410/3B-1621    225 ILCS 410/3C-8from Ch. 111, par. 1703C-822    225 ILCS 410/Art. IIID 23    heading24    225 ILCS 410/3D-525    225 ILCS 410/4-1  SB2348- 65 -LRB104 09872 AAS 19940 b1    225 ILCS 410/4-2from Ch. 111, par. 1704-22    225 ILCS 410/4-4from Ch. 111, par. 1704-43    225 ILCS 410/4-6.14    225 ILCS 410/4-7from Ch. 111, par. 1704-75    225 ILCS 410/4-9from Ch. 111, par. 1704-96    225 ILCS 410/4-19from Ch. 111, par. 1704-197    225 ILCS 410/4-20from Ch. 111, par. 1704-208    225 ILCS 410/Art. IIIE 9    rep.10    730 ILCS 5/5-5-5from Ch. 38, par. 1005-5-511    775 ILCS 50/512    820 ILCS 206/40